California statutes. Revenue and Taxation Code
(c) The State Department of Social Services shall annually report on its internet website information on the process for the distribution
 of funds, the amount of moneys distributed to the designated nonprofit organization, the matching funds or in-kind materials provided by the designated nonprofit organization, and the amount of money spent on administration.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 28, Sec. 147.   (SB 1380)   Effective January 1, 2023.   Inoperative on or before January 1, 2029, as provided in Section 18898.    Repealed on or before December 1, 2029, pursuant to Section 18898.)
-------------------------------------------

18898.

(a) Except as otherwise provided in subdivision (b), this article shall remain in effect only until January 1, 2029, and is repealed as of December 1 of that year.

(b) (1) By September 1 of the second calendar year and each subsequent calendar year that the School Supplies for Homeless Children Voluntary Tax Contribution Fund appears on the tax return, the Franchise Tax Board shall do all of the following:

(A) Determine the minimum contribution amount required to be received during the next calendar year for the fund to appear on the tax return for the taxable year that includes that next calendar year.

(B) Provide
 written notification to the State Department of Social Services of the amount determined in subparagraph (A).

(C) Determine whether the amount of contributions estimated to be received during the calendar year will equal or exceed the minimum contribution amount determined by the Franchise Tax Board for the calendar year pursuant to subparagraph (A). The Franchise Tax Board shall estimate the amount of contributions to be received by using the actual amounts received and an estimate of the contributions that will be received by the end of that calendar year.

(2) If the Franchise Tax Board determines that the amount of the contributions estimated to be received during a calendar year will not at least equal the minimum contribution amount for the calendar year, this article shall be inoperative with respect to taxable years beginning on or after January 1 of that calendar year and
 shall be repealed on December 1 of that year.

(3) For purposes of this section, the minimum contribution amount for a calendar year means two hundred fifty thousand dollars ($250,000) for the second calendar year after the first appearance of the School Supplies for Homeless Children Voluntary Tax Contribution Fund on the personal income tax return or the adjusted minimum contribution amount adjusted pursuant to subdivision (c).

(c) For each calendar year, beginning with the third calendar year after the first appearance of the School Supplies for Homeless Children Voluntary Tax Contribution Fund on the personal income tax return, the Franchise Tax Board shall adjust, on or before September 1 of that calendar year, the minimum contribution amount specified in subdivision (b) as follows:

(1) The minimum estimated
 contribution amount for the calendar year shall be an amount equal to the product of the minimum estimated contribution amount for the calendar year multiplied by the inflation factor adjustment as specified in subparagraph (A) of paragraph (2) of subdivision (h) of Section 17041, rounded off to the nearest dollar.

(2) The inflation factor adjustment used for the calendar year shall be based on the figures for the percentage change in the California Consumer Price Index for all items received on or before August 1 of the calendar year pursuant to paragraph (1) of subdivision (h) of Section 17041.

(d) Notwithstanding the repeal of this article, any contribution amounts designated pursuant to this article prior to its repeal shall continue to be transferred and disbursed in accordance with this article as in effect immediately prior to that
 repeal.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 96, Sec. 5.   (AB 742)   Effective January 1, 2022.   Repealed on December 1, 2029, by subd. (a), or on earlier date prescribed in subd. (b).    Note: Termination provisions affect Article 20, commencing with Section 18895.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 21. State Parks Protection Fund [18900.1. - 18900.4.]

18900.1.

(a) For taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 2012, the Franchise Tax Board shall revise the individual taxpayer return form to allow an individual to designate a contribution in excess of tax liability, if any, be made to the State Parks Protection Fund established by Section 18900.2.

(b) A contribution shall be in a full dollar amount and may be made individually by each signatory on a
 joint return.

(c) A designation made under subdivision (a) shall be made for any taxable year on the original return for that taxable year, and once made shall be irrevocable. In the event that payments and credits reported on the return, together with any other credits associated with the taxpayer’s account, do not exceed the taxpayer’s tax liability, if any, the return shall be treated as though no designation had been made. In the event that no designee is specified, the contribution shall, after reimbursement of the direct actual costs of the Franchise Tax Board for the collection and administration of funds under the article, be transferred to the General Fund.

(d) If an individual designates a contribution to more than one account or fund listed on the tax return, and the amount available is insufficient to satisfy the total amount designated, the contribution shall be
 allocated among the designated accounts on a pro rata basis.

(e) A taxpayer making a designation under subdivision (a) shall be entitled to receive a single state parks day use annual pass from the Department of Parks and Recreation if the price of a single state parks day use annual pass, as determined by the Department of Parks and Recreation, is less than or equal to the amount of the taxpayer’s contribution.

(f) The state parks day use annual pass that an individual is entitled to receive pursuant to this section shall provide the passholder with unlimited day use access to the California state parks that are accessible with a vehicle day use annual pass, as those parks are listed on the Department of Parks and Recreation’s Internet Web site, and shall be valid for one year beginning on the date of issuance.

(g) The Franchise Tax Board shall revise the form of the return to include a space labeled the “State Parks Protection Fund/Parks Pass Purchase” to allow for the designation permitted under subdivision (a). The form shall also include in the instructions information that the contribution may be in the amount of one dollar ($1) or more and that if the contribution amount is equal to or exceeds the price of a single state parks day use annual pass, as determined by the Department of Parks and Recreation, the taxpayer will be entitled to a single state parks day use annual pass from the Department of Parks and Recreation. The instructions shall also include information indicating that the contribution shall be used by the Department of Parks and Recreation to cover the costs of the issuance of state parks day use annual passes to individual taxpayers who made a designation for that purpose pursuant to this section, and for purposes related to the protection and preservation of state parks.

(h) Notwithstanding the provisions of Article 2 (commencing with Section 19542) of Chapter 7, the Franchise Tax Board shall provide necessary information, including the names and addresses of individual taxpayers who contributed to the State Parks Protection Fund, to the Department of Parks and Recreation so that the department may contact the individuals entitled to a state parks day use annual pass under this section and implement a procedure for the distribution of a state parks day use annual pass to those individuals.

(i) A deduction shall be allowed under Article 6 (commencing with Section 17201) of Chapter 3 of Part 10 for any contribution made pursuant to subdivision (a), but only with respect to the amount contributed in excess of the price of the state parks day use annual pass received, if any, pursuant to this section.

(History: Added by Stats. 2012, Ch. 533, Sec. 4.   (AB 1589)   Effective January 1, 2013.   Repealed conditionally, as prescribed in Section 18900.4.)
-------------------------------------------

18900.2.

There is hereby established in the State Treasury the State Parks Protection Fund to receive contributions made pursuant to Section 18900.1. The Franchise Tax Board shall notify the Controller of both the amount of money paid by taxpayers in excess of their tax liability and the amount of refund money that taxpayers have designated pursuant to Section 18900.1 to be transferred to the State Parks Protection Fund. The Controller shall transfer from the Personal Income Tax Fund to the
 State Parks Protection Fund an amount not in excess of the sum of the amounts designated by individuals pursuant to Section 18900.1 for payment into that fund.

(History: Added by Stats. 2012, Ch. 533, Sec. 4.   (AB 1589)   Effective January 1, 2013.   Repealed conditionally, as prescribed in Section 18900.4.)
-------------------------------------------

18900.3.

All moneys transferred to the State Parks Protection Fund, upon appropriation by the Legislature, shall be allocated as follows:

(a) To the Franchise Tax Board and the Controller only for reimbursement of all costs incurred by the Franchise Tax Board and the Controller in connection with their duties under this article.

(b) To the Department of Parks and
 Recreation to cover the costs of the issuance of state parks day use annual passes to individual taxpayers who made a designation for that purpose pursuant to Section 18900.1, and for purposes related to the protection and preservation of state parks.

(History: Added by Stats. 2012, Ch. 533, Sec. 4.   (AB 1589)   Effective January 1, 2013.   Repealed conditionally, as prescribed in Section 18900.4.)
-------------------------------------------

18900.4.

(a) (1) By September 1 of the second calendar year and each subsequent calendar year that the State Parks Protection Fund appears on the tax return, the Franchise Tax Board shall do all of the following:

(A) Determine the minimum contribution amount required to be received during the next calendar year for the fund
 to appear on the tax return for the taxable year that includes that next calendar year.

(B) Determine whether the amount of contributions estimated to be received during the calendar year will equal or exceed the minimum contribution amount determined by the Franchise Tax Board for the calendar year pursuant to subparagraph (A). The Franchise Tax Board shall estimate the amount of contributions to be received by using the actual amounts received and an estimate of the contributions that will be received by the end of that calendar year.

(2) If the Franchise Tax Board determines that the amount of the contributions estimated to be received during a calendar year will not at least equal the minimum contribution amount for the calendar year, this article is repealed with respect to taxable years beginning on or after January 1 of that calendar year.

(3) For purposes of this section, the minimum contribution amount for a calendar year means two hundred fifty thousand dollars ($250,000) for the second calendar year after the first appearance of the State Parks Protection Fund on the personal income tax return or the minimum contribution amount as adjusted pursuant to subdivision (b).

(b) For each calendar year, beginning with the third calendar year after the first appearance of the State Parks Protection Fund on the personal income tax return, the Franchise Tax Board shall adjust, on or before September 1 of that calendar year, the minimum contribution amount specified in subdivision (a) as follows:

(1) The minimum contribution amount for the calendar year shall be an amount equal to the product of the minimum contribution amount for the prior calendar year
 multiplied by the inflation factor adjustment as specified in subparagraph (A) of paragraph (2) of subdivision (h) of Section 17041, rounded off to the nearest dollar.

(2) The inflation factor adjustment used for the calendar year shall be based on the figures for the percentage change in the California Consumer Price Index for all items received on or before August 1 of the calendar year pursuant to paragraph (1) of subdivision (h) of Section 17041.

(c) Notwithstanding the repeal of this article, any contribution amounts designated pursuant to this article prior to its repeal shall continue to be transferred and disbursed in accordance with this article as in effect immediately prior to that repeal.

(History: Added by Stats. 2012, Ch. 533, Sec. 4.   (AB 1589)   Effective January 1, 2013.   Repealed conditionally, by its own provisions.   Note: Repeal affects Article 21, commencing with Section 18900.1.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 23.5. Prevention of Animal Homelessness and Cruelty Voluntary Tax Contribution Fund [18901.9. - 18901.9.3.]

18901.9.

(a) An individual may designate on the tax return that a contribution in excess of the tax liability, if any, be made to the Prevention of Animal Homelessness and Cruelty Voluntary Tax Contribution Fund established by Section 18901.9.1. That designation is to be used as a voluntary contribution on the tax return.

(b) The contributions shall be in full dollar amounts and may be made individually by each signatory on a joint return.

(c) A designation under subdivision (a) shall be made for a taxable year on the original return for that taxable year and once made is irrevocable. If payments and credits
 reported on the return, together with any other credits associated with the taxpayer’s account, do not exceed the taxpayer’s liability, the return shall be treated as though no designation has been made.

(d) When another voluntary contribution designation is removed from the tax return, or as soon as space is available, whichever occurs first, the Franchise Tax Board shall revise the form of the return to include a space labeled the “Prevention of Animal Homelessness and Cruelty Voluntary Tax Contribution Fund” to allow for the designation permitted. The form shall also include in the instructions information that the contribution may be in the amount of one dollar ($1) or more and that the contribution shall be used to fund programs designed to prevent and eliminate cat and dog homelessness, including spay and neuter programs.

(e) A deduction shall be allowed under Article 6 (commencing with Section 17201) of Chapter 3 of Part 10 for any contribution made pursuant to subdivision (a).

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 234, Sec. 1.   (AB 1983)   Effective January 1, 2025.   Inoperative on date prescribed in Section 18901.9.3.   Repealed on December 1 following inoperative date.)
-------------------------------------------

18901.9.1.

(a) There is hereby established in the State Treasury the Prevention of Animal Homelessness and Cruelty Voluntary Tax Contribution Fund to receive contributions made pursuant to Section 18901.9.

(b) The Franchise Tax Board shall notify the Controller of both the amount of money paid by taxpayers in excess of their tax liability and the amount of refund money that taxpayers have designated pursuant to Section 18901.9 to be transferred to the Prevention of Animal Homelessness and Cruelty Voluntary Tax Contribution Fund.

(c) The Controller shall transfer from the Personal Income Tax Fund to the
 Prevention of Animal Homelessness and Cruelty Voluntary Tax Contribution Fund an amount not in excess of the sum of amounts designated by individuals pursuant to Section 18901.9 for payment into that fund.

(d) Notwithstanding any law and the repeal of this article, all moneys in the prior Prevention of Animal Homelessness and Cruelty Voluntary Contribution Fund, as established by Chapter 557 of the Statutes of 2015, shall continue to be transferred and disbursed in accordance with prior Article 23 (commencing with Section 18901), as that article read immediately prior to its repeal.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 234, Sec. 1.   (AB 1983)   Effective January 1, 2025.   Inoperative on date prescribed in Section 18901.9.3.   Repealed on December 1 following inoperative date.)
-------------------------------------------

18901.9.2.

(a) Notwithstanding Section 13340 of the Government Code, all moneys transferred to the Prevention of Animal Homelessness and Cruelty Voluntary Tax Contribution Fund shall be continuously appropriated and allocated as follows:

(1) To the Franchise Tax Board and the Controller for reimbursement of all costs incurred by the Franchise Tax Board and the Controller in connection with their duties under this article.

(2) To the Department of Food and Agriculture for allocation as follows:

(A) Up to 5 percent of the funds allocated to the department shall
 be used by the department for the development of a mechanism to provide ongoing public awareness through activities that will promote the charitable tax deduction for the fund and seek continued contributions. These activities may include convening a philanthropic roundtable, developing literature for use by the city, county, or city and county animal control agency or shelter that is current on its reporting requirements to the State Department of Public Health, Veterinary Public Health Section, a society for the prevention of cruelty to animals affiliate, or a
 humane society affiliate for dissemination, and whatever other activities are deemed necessary and appropriate to promote the fund.

(B) Up to 5 percent of the funds allocated to the department may be used for administration of the grant program.

(C) (i) The remaining funds shall be used to provide grants through the
 grant program funded by the Pet Lover’s Fund, as described in subdivisions (c) and (e) of Section 5168 of the Vehicle Code.

(ii) Funds described in clause (i) shall not be subject to any allocation described in subdivision (d) of Section 5168 of the Vehicle Code.

(b) The Prevention of Animal Homelessness and Cruelty Voluntary Tax Contribution Fund moneys shall not be used to supplant state General Fund moneys for any purpose.

(c) The Department of Food and Agriculture shall report on its internet website information provided by its grantees, if any, regarding the process for awarding money, the amount of money spent on administration, and an
 itemization of how program funds were awarded.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 234, Sec. 1.   (AB 1983)   Effective January 1, 2025.   Inoperative on date prescribed in Section 18901.9.3.   Repealed on December 1 following inoperative date.)
-------------------------------------------

18901.9.3.

(a) Except as otherwise provided in subdivision (b), this article shall remain operative only until January 1 of the seventh calendar year following the first appearance of the Prevention of Animal Homelessness and Cruelty Voluntary Tax Contribution Fund on the tax return, and is repealed as of December 1 of that year.

(b) (1) By September 1 of the second calendar year and by September 1 of each subsequent calendar year that the Prevention of Animal Homelessness
 and Cruelty Voluntary Tax Contribution Fund appears on the tax return, the Franchise Tax Board shall determine whether the amount of contributions estimated to be received during the calendar year will equal or exceed the minimum contribution amount for the calendar year. The Franchise Tax Board shall estimate the amount of contributions to be received by using the actual amounts received and an estimate of the contributions that will be received by the end of that calendar year.

(2) If the Franchise Tax Board determines that the amount of the contributions estimated to be received during a calendar year will not at least equal the minimum contribution amount for the calendar year, this article shall be inoperative with respect to taxable years beginning on or after January 1 of that calendar year and shall be repealed on December 1 of that
 year.

(3) For purposes of this section, the minimum contribution amount for a calendar year means two hundred fifty thousand dollars ($250,000).

(c) Notwithstanding the repeal of this article, any contribution amounts designated pursuant to this article prior to its repeal shall continue to be transferred and disbursed in accordance with this article as in effect immediately prior to that repeal.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 234, Sec. 1.   (AB 1983)   Effective January 1, 2025.   Repealed on December 1 of year prescribed in subd. (a) or subd. (b).   Note: Termination provisions affect Article 23.5, commencing with Section 18901.9.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 4. Payments and Assessments [19001. - 19195.]



  ARTICLE 1. Payment of Tax by All Persons [19001. - 19011.5.]

19001.

Except as provided by Article 2 (commencing with Section 19021), the tax imposed under Part 10 (commencing with Section 17001) and Part 11 (commencing with Section 23001) shall be paid at the time and place fixed for filing the return (determined without regard to any extension of time for filing the return).

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 31, Sec. 26.   Effective June 16, 1993.   Operative January 1, 1994, by Sec. 83 of Ch. 31.)
-------------------------------------------

19002.

(a) The amount withheld under Article 5 (commencing with Section 18661) of Chapter 2 or Section 13020 of the Unemployment Insurance Code during any calendar year shall be allowed to the recipient of the income as a credit against the tax for the taxable year with respect to which the amount was withheld.

(b) In the case of a partnership, limited liability company classified as a partnership for California income tax purposes, or S corporation filing a group return as agent for electing nonresident partners or shareholders in accordance with Section 18535, for purposes of this part, the amount withheld under Article 5 (commencing with Section 18661) of Chapter 2 during any taxable year shall be allowed as a credit attributable to the partnership, limited liability
 company, or S corporation on the group return for the taxable year with respect to which that amount was withheld.

(c) (1) For purposes of Section 19306, any tax actually deducted and withheld during any calendar year under Article 5 (commencing with Section 18661) of Chapter 2 or Section 13020 of the Unemployment Insurance Code shall, in respect of the recipient of the income, be deemed to have been paid on the last day prescribed for filing the return under Article 1 (commencing with Section 18501) or Article 2 (commencing with Section 18601) of Chapter 2 (without regard to any extension of time for filing the return), with respect to which the tax is allowable as a credit under subdivision (a) or (b).

(2) For purposes of Sections 19306 and 19340, any amount paid as estimated tax under Section 19025 or 19136 of this code or Section 13043 of the Unemployment
 Insurance Code for any taxable year shall be deemed to have been paid on the last day prescribed for filing the return under Article 1 (commencing with Section 18501) or Article 2 (commencing with Section 18601) of Chapter 2 (without regard to any extension of time for filing the return).

(d) Notwithstanding subdivision (b) or (c), for purposes of Section 19306 with respect to any tax deducted and withheld under Article 5 (commencing with Section 18661) of Chapter 2 or Section 13020 of the Unemployment Insurance Code both of the following shall apply:

(1) If a return is filed before the due date for that return, the return shall be considered filed on the due date.

(2) If a tax with respect to an amount paid is paid before the due date for that return, the tax shall be considered paid on the due date.

(e) If any overpayment of income tax is claimed as a credit against estimated tax for the succeeding taxable year, that amount shall be considered as a payment of estimated tax in accordance with Section 19007, for the succeeding taxable year, and no claim for credit or refund of the overpayment shall be allowed for the taxable year in which the overpayment arises.

(f) In the case of a nonresident alien electing to file in a group return pursuant to Section 18537, the amount withheld under Article 5 (commencing with Section 18661) of Chapter 2 or Section 13020 of the Unemployment Insurance Code during any calendar year shall be allowed to the recipient of the income as a credit against the tax for the taxable year with respect to which the amount was withheld.

(History: Amended (as amended by Stats. 2020, Ch. 102, Sec. 5) by Stats. 2025, Ch. 73, Sec. 5.   (AB 1518)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

19004.

A taxpayer may elect to pay the tax prior to the date prescribed for its payment.

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 31, Sec. 26.   Effective June 16, 1993.   Operative January 1, 1994, by Sec. 83 of Ch. 31.)
-------------------------------------------

19005.

The tax, and any interest and penalties, shall be paid to the Franchise Tax Board. Except as provided in Section 19011 with respect to an electronic funds transfer, remittances may be in the form of a check, payable in United States funds to the Franchise Tax Board, at the time and in the manner as the Franchise Tax Board may prescribe or, notwithstanding Title 1.3 (commencing with Section 1747) of Part 4 of Title 3 of the Civil Code, in the form of a credit card or other payment device as defined in Chapter 2.6 (commencing with Section 6160) of the
 Government Code, at the time and in the manner that the Franchise Tax Board may prescribe. If a check or credit card remittance is not paid by the bank on which it is drawn, the taxpayer tendering the check or credit card remittance remains liable for the payment of the tax, and all interest and penalties, as if the check or credit card remittance had not been tendered.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1999, Ch. 203, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------

19006.

(a) The spouse who controls the disposition of or who receives or spends community income as well as the spouse who is taxable on the income is liable for the payment of the taxes imposed by Part 10 (commencing with Section 17001) on that income.

(b) Whenever a joint return is filed by spouses, the liability for the tax on the aggregate
 income is joint and several. The liability may be revised by a court in a proceeding for dissolution of the marriage or for termination of the registered domestic partnership of the spouses, provided:

(1) The order revising tax liability may not relieve a spouse of tax liability on income earned by or subject to the exclusive management and control of the spouse. The liability of the spouse for the tax, penalties, and interest due for the taxable year shall be in the same ratio to total tax, penalties, and interest due for the taxable year as the income earned by or subject to the management and control of the spouse is to total gross income reportable on the return.

(2) The order revising tax liability:

(A) Must separately state the income tax liabilities for the taxable years for which revision of tax liability is
 granted.

(B) Shall not revise a tax liability that has been fully paid prior to the effective date of the order; however, any unpaid amount may be revised.

(C) Shall become effective when the Franchise Tax Board is served with or acknowledges receipt of the order.

(D) Shall not be effective if the gross income reportable on the return exceeds one hundred fifty thousand dollars ($150,000) or the amount of tax liability the spouse is relieved of exceeds seven thousand five hundred dollars ($7,500), unless a tax revision clearance certificate is obtained from the Franchise Tax Board and filed with the court.

(c) Notwithstanding subdivisions (a) and (b), whenever a joint return is filed by spouses and the tax liability is not fully paid, that liability,
 including interest and penalties, may be revised by the Franchise Tax Board as to one spouse.

(1) However, the liability shall not be revised:

(A) To relieve a spouse of tax liability on income earned by or subject to the exclusive management and control of the spouse. The liability of the spouse for the tax, penalties, and interest due for the taxable year shall be in the same ratio to total tax, penalties, and interest due for the taxable year as the income earned by or subject to the management and control of the spouse is to total gross income reportable on the return.

(B) To relieve a spouse of liability below the amount actually paid on the liability prior to the granting of relief, including credit from any other taxable year available for application to the liability.

(2) The liability may be revised only if the spouse whose liability is to be revised establishes that he or she did not know of, and had no reason to know of, the nonpayment at the time the return was filed. For purposes of this paragraph, “reason to know” means whether or not a reasonably prudent person would have had reason to know of the nonpayment.

(3) For purposes of this section, the determination of the spouse to whom items of gross income are attributable shall be made without regard to community property laws.

(4) The determination of the Franchise Tax Board as to whether the liability is to be revised as to one spouse shall be made not less than 30 days after notification of the other spouse and shall be based upon whether, under all of the facts and circumstances surrounding the nonpayment, it would be
 inequitable to hold the spouse requesting revision liable for the nonpayment. Any action taken under this section shall be treated as though it were action on a protest taken under Section 19044 and shall become final upon the expiration of 30 days from the date that notice of the action is mailed to both spouses, unless, within that 30-day period, one or both spouses appeal the determination to the board as provided in Section 19045.

(5) This subdivision shall apply to all taxable years subject to the provisions of this part, but shall not apply to any taxable year which has been closed by a statute of limitations, res judicata, or otherwise.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 50, Sec. 107.   (SB 1005)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

19007.

Payment of the estimated tax, or any installment thereof, shall be considered payment on account of the taxes imposed under Part 10 (commencing with Section 17001) or Part 11 (commencing with Section 23001) for the taxable year.

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 31, Sec. 26.   Effective June 16, 1993.   Operative January 1, 1994, by Sec. 83 of Ch. 31.)
-------------------------------------------

19008.

(a) The Franchise Tax Board may, in cases of financial hardship, enter into installment payment agreements with any taxpayer under which that taxpayer is allowed to make payment of any liability imposed or collected under Part 10 (commencing with Section 17001), Part 11 (commencing with Section 23001), or this part, including any additions to tax, interest, penalties, fees, and any other amounts relating to the imposed liability, in installment payments, pursuant to the agreement, if the Franchise Tax Board determines that the agreement will facilitate full or partial collection of the liability.

(b) In the case of a liability of an individual under Part 10 (commencing with Section 17001) or this part, the Franchise Tax Board
 shall enter into an agreement to accept the full payment of the liability in installments if, as of the date the individual offers to enter into the agreement, all of the following apply:

(1) The aggregate amount of the liability (determined without regard to interest, penalties, additions to the tax, and additional amounts) does not exceed twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000).

(2) The taxpayer (and, if the liability relates to a joint return, the taxpayer’s spouse) has not during any of the preceding five taxable years done any of the following:

(A) Failed to file any return of liability imposed under Part 10 (commencing with Section 17001) or this part. 

(B) Failed to satisfy any term of an installment agreement under this section for payment of any
 liability imposed by Part 10 (commencing with Section 17001) or this part.

(3) The Franchise Tax Board determines that the taxpayer is financially unable to pay the liability in full when due, and the taxpayer submits any information as the Franchise Tax Board may require to make this determination.

(4) The agreement requires full payment of the liability within five years.

(5) The taxpayer agrees to comply with the provisions of this part and Part 10 (commencing with Section 17001) for the period the agreement is in effect.

(c) (1) (A) Failure by a taxpayer to comply fully with the terms of the installment payment agreement shall render the agreement null and void, unless the Franchise Tax Board determines
 that the failure was due to a reasonable cause, and the total amount of tax, interest, and all penalties shall be immediately due and payable. Except in any case where the Franchise Tax Board finds collection of the tax to which an installment payment agreement relates to be in jeopardy, or there is a mutual consent to terminate, alter, or modify the agreement, the agreement shall not be considered null and void, or otherwise terminated, unless both of the following occur:

(i) A notice of termination is provided to the taxpayer not later than 30 days before the date of termination.

(ii) The notice includes an explanation of why the Franchise Tax Board intends to terminate the agreement.

(B) This paragraph shall apply only to agreements entered into before January 1, 2024.

(2) (A) (i) The Franchise Tax Board may alter, modify, or terminate an agreement entered into under this section if any of the following apply:

(I) Information that the taxpayer provided to the Franchise Tax Board before the date the agreement was entered into was inaccurate or incomplete.

(II) The Franchise Tax Board determines that the collection of any liability to which an agreement under this section relates is in jeopardy.

(III) The Franchise Tax Board determines that the financial condition of a taxpayer with whom the Franchise Tax Board has entered into an agreement has significantly changed.

(IV) The taxpayer fails to make an installment
 payment at the time the installment payment is due under the agreement.

(V) The taxpayer fails to file a required tax return under this part or pay any other liability at the time that the liability is due.

(VI) The taxpayer fails to provide a financial condition update upon the Franchise Tax Board’s request.

(ii) The Franchise Tax Board may modify or alter an agreement under this section to add a liability that the taxpayer fails to pay at the time that the liability is due.

(iii) If a taxpayer is currently in an installment agreement under subdivision (a) or (b), the Franchise Tax Board may require financial hardship to alter or modify the installment agreement.

(iv) (I) Except as provided in subclause (II), the Franchise Tax Board shall not alter, modify, or terminate any agreement under this paragraph unless both of the following occur:

(ia) A notice of the alteration, modification, or termination is provided to the taxpayer not later than 30 days before the date of that action.

(ib) The notice includes an explanation of the rationale of the Franchise Tax Board for altering, modifying, or terminating the agreement.

(II) In any case where the Franchise Tax Board finds collection of the liability to which an installment payment agreement relates to be in jeopardy, the Franchise Tax Board may terminate the installment agreement and issue demand for immediate payment of the liability or the deficiency declared to be in jeopardy.

(B) This paragraph shall apply only to agreements entered into on or after January 1, 2024.

(d) No levy may be issued on the property or rights to property of any person with respect to any unpaid liability:

(1) During the period that an offer by the taxpayer for an installment agreement under this section for payment of the unpaid liability is pending with the Franchise Tax Board.

(2) If the offer is rejected by the Franchise Tax Board, during the 30 days thereafter and, if a request for review of the rejection is filed within the 30 days, during the period that the review is pending.

(3) During the period that the installment agreement for payment of the unpaid liability is in effect.

(4) If the agreement is terminated by the Franchise Tax Board, during the 30 days thereafter (and, if a request for review of the termination is filed within the 30 days, during the period that the review is pending).

(5) This subdivision shall not apply with respect to any of the following:

(A) Any unpaid liability if either of the following occurs:

(i) The taxpayer files a written notice with the Franchise Tax Board that waives the restriction imposed by this subdivision on levy with respect to the liability.

(ii) The Franchise Tax Board finds that the collection of that liability is in jeopardy.

(B) Any levy that was first
 issued before the date that the applicable proceeding under this subdivision commenced.

(C) At the discretion of the Franchise Tax Board, any unpaid liability for which the taxpayer makes an offer of an installment agreement subsequent to a rejection of an offer of an installment agreement with respect to that unpaid liability (or to any review thereof).

(D) The period of limitation under Section 19371 shall be suspended for the period during which the Franchise Tax Board is prohibited under this subdivision from making a levy.

(e) The Taxpayers’ Rights Advocate shall establish procedures for an independent departmental administrative review for the rejection of the offer of an installment payment and for installment payment agreements that are rendered null and void, or otherwise terminated under this section, for
 taxpayers that request that review. This administrative review shall not be subject to Chapter 4.5 (commencing with Section 11400) of Part 1 of Division 3 of the Government Code. Unless review is requested by the taxpayer within 30 days of the date of rejection of the offer of an installment agreement or termination of the installment agreement, this administrative review shall not stay collection of the liability to which the installment payment agreement relates.

(f) The Franchise Tax Board shall review a representative sample of existing installment agreements entered into under this section at least once every two years to ensure taxpayers are in compliance with the terms of the agreement.

(g) (1) The Franchise Tax Board may prescribe regulations as necessary or appropriate to carry out the purposes of this section.

(2) The Administrative Procedure Act (Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code) shall not apply to any standard, criterion, procedure, determination, rule, notice, guideline, or any other guidance established or issued by the Franchise Tax Board pursuant to this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 209, Sec. 1.   (AB 1765)   Effective January 1, 2024.   Note: Subd. (g) was added by Stats. 2005, Ch. 211.)
-------------------------------------------

19009.

(a) Whenever any person or employer who is required to collect, account for, and pay over any tax—(1) At the time and in the manner prescribed by law or regulations (A) fails to collect, truthfully account for, or